Hawaii statutes.
[§342B-30] Judicial review. The
applicant and any person who participated in the public comment process may
obtain judicial review in [environmental court] of the final action on a permit
issuance or renewal. This is in addition to judicial review otherwise
available. [L 1992, c 240, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next